Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-1348
Act; applicability.

The Uniform Foreign-Country Money Judgments Recognition Act applies to all actions commenced on or after August 28, 2021, in which the issue of recognition of a foreign-country judgment is raised.

Laws 2021, LB501, § 12.